Massachusetts, session 194th, S593.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11(A)(1) of chapter 21I of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the first sentence and inserting in place
thereof the following sentence:- “On a schedule to be established by the department, but no more
frequently than once every six years or when a new toxic substance is first used at a facility, and
in either case on an even-numbered year, each large quantity toxics users shall prepare and
complete a toxics use reduction plan for each facility for which they are required to file a report
in that year.”
SECTION 2. Section 11(D) of said chapter 21I, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out the words “by July 1, two years after the first plan, and then according to the
of 3

schedule specified by the department” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “by
July 1, two years after the first plan, and then every six years”.
SECTION 3. Section 11(F) of said chapter 21I, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- “Large
quantity toxics users shall file a plan summary with the department on or before July 1 of the
year in a which toxics use reduction plan is due.”
SECTION 4. Section 12(C) of said chapter 21I, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- “
Certification shall be for not more than six years and shall be renewable for additional six year
periods.”
SECTION 5. Said section 12(C) of said chapter 21I, as so appearing, is hereby amended
by inserting at the end thereof the following sentences:- “The continuing education requirement
for initial recertification and renewal shall not exceed 45 hours per certification period for
individuals certified pursuant to subsection 12(A). The continuing education requirement for
initial recertification and renewal shall not exceed 36 hours per certification period for
individuals certified pursuant to subsection 12(B). The continuing education requirement for
subsequent recertification and renewal shall not exceed 36 hours per certification period for
individuals certified pursuant to subsection 12(A). The continuing education requirement for
subsequent recertification and renewal shall not exceed 36 hours per certification period for
individuals certified pursuant to subsection 12(B).”
SECTION 6. Section 19 of said chapter 21I, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting the following subsection:-
of 3

(I) The requirements to pay any fees under this section shall not be applicable to any use
of a toxic substance that is mandated by law, regulation, drug or other product registration,
design specification of a United States governmental authority including, but not limited to, the
United States Armed Services, Department of Homeland Security or other similar United States
governmental authority, or any other legally enforceable requirement.
A toxics user shall determine the applicability of the exemption by providing an affidavit
identifying, to the extent permitted under applicable national security and confidentiality
requirements, the governmental body whose law, regulation, registration or specification requires
the use of the toxic substance.
of 3